Massachusetts, session 194th, H1102.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37 of Chapter 167 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second, third, fourth and fifth paragraphs
and inserting in place thereof the following 4 paragraphs:-
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a person, domestic or foreign
corporation, partnership, association, limited liability company, business trust, joint venture,
societies, or similar entity shall not use the name, trade name or trademark of any bank, federal
bank, federal branch, foreign bank, out-of-state bank or out-of-state branch or out-of-state federal
bank, as defined in section 1, or any federal credit union or foreign credit union as defined in
section 1 of chapter 171, or any subsidiary thereof, in any advertisement or solicitation for
products or services, without the express written consent of the financial institution.
of 3

For the purposes of this section, the word “advertisement” or “solicitation” shall mean a
communication including but not limited to a writing, email, text message, direct mail, oral
solicitation, internet website, letter, brochures, pamphlets, displays, sales literature and any other
form of electronic communication to a specifically identified consumer or which contains
specific information on the account or loan of a specifically identified consumer. The word
“electronic” shall mean relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless,
optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
A person, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, limited liability
company, business trust, joint venture, societies, or similar entity shall not make reference to an
existing bank, federal bank, federal branch, foreign bank, out-of-state bank, out-of-state branch,
out-of-state federal bank as defined in section 1 of this chapter, or federal credit union or foreign
credit union as defined in section 1 of chapter 171, or any subsidiary thereof, without the express
written consent of the bank, federal bank, federal branch, foreign bank, out-of-state bank, out-of-
state branch, out-of-state federal bank or federal credit union or foreign credit union as defined in
section 1 of chapter 171, or any subsidiary thereof, or make reference to a loan number, loan
amount or other specific loan information on the outside of an envelope, visible through the
envelope window, or on a postcard in connection with any advertisement or solicitation for
products or services to a specifically identified consumer.
A person, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, limited liability
company, business trust, joint venture, societies, or similar entity shall not include a loan
number, loan amount or other specific loan information relative to a specifically identified
consumer that is publicly available in an advertisement or solicitation for the purchase of
products or services unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously states in bold-face type on
of 3

the front page of the correspondence that the person, domestic or foreign corporation,
partnership, association, limited liability company business trust, joint venture, societies or
similar entity is not sponsored by or affiliated with and that the advertisement or solicitation is
not authorized by the bank, federal bank, federal branch, foreign bank, out-of-state bank, out-of-
state branch, out-of-state federal bank as defined in section 1, or federal credit union or foreign
credit union as defined in section 1 of chapter 171, or any subsidiary thereof. The statement shall
include the name, address and the telephone number of the person making the advertisement or
solicitation and that any loan information referenced was not provided by the bank, federal bank,
federal branch, foreign bank, out-of-state bank, out-of-state branch, out-of-state federal bank or
federal credit union or foreign credit union, or any subsidiary thereof. The statements required in
this paragraph shall also be given at the time of any oral solicitation to a specifically identified
consumer.
A person, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, limited liability
company, association, business trust, joint venture, societies or similar entity, which is
considered to have violated this section, shall be considered to have engaged in an unfair and
deceptive practice and shall be a violation of chapter 93A.
of 3